New York, session 2025-2026, A658.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Article 2-A of the social services law is amended by adding 2 a new title 3 to read as follows: 3 TITLE 3 4 OPIOID ANTAGONISTS IN HOMELESS SHELTERS 5 Section 47. Opioid antagonist use and training. 6 § 47. Opioid antagonist use and training. 1. Any provider of temporary 7 housing assistance, which shall include, but not be limited to, a family 8 shelter, a shelter for adults, a hotel, an emergency apartment, a domes- 9 tic violence shelter, a runaway and homeless youth shelter, or a safe 10 house for refugees operating in this state shall have at its premises: 11 (a) an opioid antagonist and a method of administering it on site at 12 all times which may include, but not be limited to, a naloxone kit; and 13 (b) at a minimum, one employee trained in the administration of an 14 opioid antagonist on duty at all times when applicable law, regulation, 15 code, or operating plan approved by a social services district or the 16 commissioner otherwise requires employees to be at the premises. 17 2. All employees of providers of temporary housing assistance who are 18 authorized to administer an opioid antagonist shall: 19 (a) have completed an initial training program, which may include a 20 department of health registered opioid overdose prevention training 21 program; 22 (b) complete a refresher training program at least every two years; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02157-01-5 A. 658 2 1 (c) contact the emergency medical system during any response to a 2 victim of suspected drug overdose and advise if an opioid antagonist is 3 being used; 4 (d) comply with protocols for response to victims of suspected drug 5 overdose; and 6 (e) report all responses to victims of suspected drug overdose to the 7 department of health. 8 3. All providers of temporary housing assistance shall develop a 9 training plan in conjunction with a registered opioid overdose 10 prevention program in the applicable region regarding the administration 11 of opioid antagonists to any individual residing on a provider's prem- 12 ises who is at risk of experiencing or witnessing an opioid overdose. 13 4. For the purposes of this subdivision, the term "opioid antagonist" 14 shall mean a federal food and drug administration-approved drug that, 15 when administered, negates or neutralizes in whole or in part the phar- 16 macological effects of an opioid in the body and that is limited to 17 naloxone or other medications approved by the department of health for 18 this purpose and "naloxone kit" shall mean a prefilled naloxone syringe 19 or needle-free intranasal drug delivery device. 20 5. The commissioner is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations 21 necessary for the implementation of this title. 22 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 23 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 24 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 25 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 26 on or before such effective date.